Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 2

Disposition of Documents and Evidence

18-1-201. Disposition of documents according to order of court.

The clerks of the courts of record in this state are authorized and empowered to make such disposition of records, dockets, books, ledgers and other documents as the judges of their respective courts may severally direct, subject to the provisions set out in §§18-1-202 —18-1-205.

Acts 1953, ch. 207, § 1 (Williams, § 10074.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 11.

Cited: Ray v. State, 984 S.W.2d 236, 1997 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 1350 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1997).

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 39.

Clerks of Courts
69.

18-1-202. Documents disposable.

In all cases that have been finally disposed of, for a period of more than ten (10) years, the clerks of the courts of record are empowered and authorized under the direction and order of the judges of their respective courts to dispose of the records, dockets, books, ledgers and other documents in all such cases, except the clerk shall retain and safely keep the pleadings, original process and original opinion, if any, all original rules, appearance and execution dockets, minute books, plat or plan books; provided, that all other records, dockets, books, ledgers and documents maintained by the clerks may be disposed of by the clerks after they have ceased to be current after a period of ten (10) years; provided, however, that the disposition is ordered by the respective judges of the courts.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the clerks of the juvenile courts are empowered and authorized under the direction and order of the judges of their respective courts to dispose of original pleadings, process, opinions, records, dockets, books, ledgers, and all other documents in delinquent and unruly juvenile court cases after a period of ten (10) years following the juvenile reaching eighteen (18) years of age. Prior to ordering the clerk to dispose of original documents, the court must notify the district attorney general of the proposed order and provide the district attorney general reasonable time to file a notice of opposition to the proposed order.

In civil cases, a judge may order the clerk to destroy discovery materials, briefs, cost bonds, subpoenas and other temporary records three (3) years after the final disposition of the case or three (3) years after records sealed by order of the court have been unsealed. When the order is entered, the court clerk shall notify the parties of the three-year disposition schedule for temporary records, and that the parties may remove temporary records filed by the party during the three-year period. For the purpose of this subsection (b), “final disposition of a case” means the time when judgment has been entered and the appeal times have lapsed for all parties. This subsection (b) shall not apply if any party is a minor.

Acts 1953, ch. 207, § 2 (Williams, § 10074.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-111; Acts 1998, ch. 696, § 1; 2019, ch. 242, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 242, § 2. May 2, 2019.

18-1-203. Minute order for disposition of documents.

Any order issued by any of the judges of courts of record, as authorized in §18-1-202, shall be entered on the minutes of the court, setting forth generally what papers, books, documents and records may be disposed of. A detailed inventory in the minute entry shall not be required.

Acts 1953, ch. 207, § 3 (Williams, § 10074.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-112.

18-1-204. Preservation of historical records.

Before the clerk destroys or otherwise disposes of, pursuant to §18-1-202, any records, dockets, books, papers, ledgers and documents, when so authorized by the court, the clerk shall give ninety (90) days' notice to the state librarian and archivist, whereupon the state librarian and archivist, or the state librarian and archivist's representative, shall examine and remove and take into the state librarian and archivist's possession for preservation any document, book, ledger or record that the state librarian and archivist believes to be of value for historical or other scholarly purposes.

Acts 1953, ch. 207, § 4 (Williams, § 10074.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-113.

Collateral References. Clerks of Courts
69.

18-1-205. Periodical disposal of documents.

The courts shall order the disposition of the records, papers, dockets, books, ledgers or other documents enumerated in §§18-1-202 —18-1-204 annually or at such other times as may be thought to be advisable.

Acts 1953, ch. 207, § 5 (Williams, § 10074.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-114.

18-1-206. Disposal of physical evidence.

Physical evidence other than documents and firearms used in judicial proceedings and in the custody of a court in cases where all appeals or potential appeals of a judgment have ended or when the case has been settled, dismissed or otherwise brought to a conclusion, may be disposed of as follows:

The clerk of the court having custody of the physical evidence to be disposed of shall notify the attorneys of record in the case for which the evidence was used that certain enumerated items are no longer needed by the court and that they have thirty (30) days from the date of notification to claim any of the items belonging to them or their clients. If after thirty (30) days the attorneys have not claimed and removed the items of evidence, the clerk shall dispose of the evidence in the manner prescribed by subdivisions (a)(2)-(7);

The clerk of the court having custody of the physical evidence to be disposed of shall annually inventory the physical evidence and prepare a list of the evidence proposed to be destroyed with references to the case involved and the term of court in which the evidence was used;

The clerk shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county for three (3) consecutive weeks the proposed list of items of physical evidence selected for disposition;

Parties interested in the disposition of physical evidence may submit a petition to the court stating their objections to the proposed disposition within thirty (30) days of the initial newspaper publication;

After the time for filing petitions objecting to the disposition has passed, the clerk shall submit the list with any filed petition to the court. The court shall approve or reject each item on the list and shall order that each particular item be disposed of in one (1) of the following ways:

Returned to the owner or the owner's attorney of record if the attorney agrees;

Preserved by a specified organization for historical purposes;

Sold; or

Destroyed;

The clerk shall deliver the order and the items approved for disposition to the custody of the sheriff or the chief of police in counties having a metropolitan form of government for disposition in accordance with the order of the court; and

The sheriff shall deliver the physical evidence to the owner or owners or to the organization or organizations when so ordered, personally or by return receipt mail. When ordered to sell physical evidence, the sheriff shall advertise in a newspaper of general circulation the sales, for not less than three (3) editions and not less than thirty (30) days prior to the sales. The sheriff shall conduct a public sale and maintain a record of each sale and the amount received. The proceeds of the sale or sales shall be deposited forthwith in the county general fund. When ordered to destroy physical evidence, the sheriff shall completely destroy each item by cutting, crushing, burning or melting and shall file an affidavit concerning the destruction with the clerk of the court ordering the destruction, showing a description of each item, the method of destruction, the date and place of destruction and the names and addresses of all witnesses. In counties having a metropolitan form of government, all references to the sheriff in this subdivision (a)(7) means the chief of police.

This section shall not act to amend or repeal any of the provisions of any private act or acts that provide for the disposal of physical evidence or exhibits used in any judicial proceeding in any county having a population of over six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1985, ch. 187, § 1; 1989, ch. 113, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Disposal of property by sheriff, title 8, ch. 8, part 5.

Uniform disposition of unclaimed property, title 66, ch. 29, part 1.

Cited: Ray v. State, 984 S.W.2d 236, 1997 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 1350 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1997).